Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5995XS (3) 91 mb/jh S.F. 2118 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 280.13H Participation in 1 non-school-sponsored athletic contests or competitions. 2 1. For purposes of this section, âunattached competitorâ 3 means a student who does not represent a school and does not 4 wear a school uniform or other apparel identifying the student 5 with a school. 6 2. A student in grades nine through twelve enrolled in a 7 school district or accredited nonpublic school may participate 8 in an athletic contest or competition that is not sponsored by 9 the studentâs school, including a contest or competition in 10 which collegiate students participate, so long as the student 11 participates only as an unattached competitor. 12 3. A school shall not provide coaching, transportation, 13 or financial support to a student related to the studentâs 14 participation in an athletic contest or competition as an 15 unattached competitor. 16